lt-LT: Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priežiūros rinkinio paskirtis: Gilusis valymas; Mundštuko valymas; Poliravimas / apdailos priežiūra; Profesionalų rinkinys; Įprastinė priežiūra; Mokyklos / orkestro programos rinkinys; Slankiklio priežiūra (trombono); Mokinio pradedančiojo rinkinys; Kelioninis / nenumatytų atvejų rinkinys; Vožtuvų priežiūra (vožtuviniams variniams instrumentams); Kitas
hu: Rézfúvós hangszer ápolókészletének rendeltetése: Alapos tisztítás; Fúvókatisztítás; Polírozás/felületápolás; Professzionális készlet; Rutinszerű karbantartás; Iskolai/zenekari készlet; Tolócső-karbantartó (harsona); Kezdő tanulókészlet; Utazó/vészkészlet; Szelepkarbantartó (szelepes rézfúvós); Egyéb
fi: Vaski-instrumenttien hoitopakkauksen käyttötarkoitus: Syväpuhdistus; Suukappaleen puhdistus; Kiillotus/pinnanhoito; Ammattilaissarja; Rutiinihuolto; Koulu-/bändisarja; Vetoputken huolto (pasuuna); Oppilaan aloituspakkaus; Matka-/hätäpakkaus; Venttiilihuolto (venttiilisoittimet); Muu
de: Verwendungszweck des Pflegesets für Blechblasinstrumente: Tiefenreinigung; Mundstückreinigung; Polieren/Oberflächenpflege; Profi-Set; Regelmäßige Wartung; Schul-/Band-Set; Zugwartung (Posaune); Anfänger-Set; Reise-/Notfall-Set; Ventilwartung (Blechblasinstrumente mit Ventilen); Sonstige
hr-HR: Svrha kompleta za njegu mesinganih instrumenata: Dubinsko čišćenje; Čišćenje usnika; Poliranje / njega završnog sloja; Profesionalni komplet; Redovito održavanje; Komplet za školske i puhačke orkestre; Održavanje povlačka (trombon); Početnički studentski komplet; Komplet za putovanje / hitne slučajeve; Održavanje ventila (limena glazbala s ventilima); Ostalo
fr: Usage du kit d’entretien pour cuivres: Nettoyage en profondeur; Nettoyage de l'embouchure; Polissage/entretien de la finition; Kit professionnel; Entretien de routine; Kit pour école/harmonie; Entretien de la coulisse (trombone); Kit de démarrage pour élève; Kit de voyage/de secours; Entretien des pistons (cuivres à pistons); Autre
sl-SI: Namen kompleta za nego trobil: Globinsko čiščenje; Čiščenje ustnika; Poliranje/nega zunanjosti; Profesionalni komplet; Redno vzdrževanje; Šolski komplet/komplet za pihalne orkestre; Vzdrževanje potega (pozavna); Začetni komplet za učence; Potovalni/zasilni komplet; Vzdrževanje ventilov (trobila na ventile); Drugo
it: Scopo del kit di cura per strumenti in ottone: Pulizia profonda; Pulizia del bocchino; Lucidatura/cura della finitura; Kit professionale; Manutenzione di routine; Kit per programmi scolastici/bande; Manutenzione della coulisse (trombone); Kit per principianti/studenti; Kit da viaggio/emergenza; Manutenzione valvole (ottoni a pistoni); Altro
el: Σκοπός κιτ φροντίδας χάλκινων οργάνων: Βαθύς καθαρισμός; Καθαρισμός επιστομίου; Γυάλισμα/φροντίδα φινιρίσματος; Επαγγελματικό κιτ; Συνήθης συντήρηση; Κιτ σχολείου/μουσικού συνόλου; Συντήρηση ολισθητήρα (τρομπόνι); Αρχικό κιτ μαθητή; Κιτ ταξιδιού/έκτακτης ανάγκης; Συντήρηση βαλβίδων (χάλκινα με βαλβίδες); Άλλο
ru: Назначение набора для ухода за духовыми инструментами: Глубокая очистка; Очистка мундштука; Полировка / уход за покрытием; Профессиональный набор; Регулярное обслуживание; Набор для школьного оркестра; Обслуживание кулисы (тромбон); Стартовый набор для ученика; Дорожный / аварийный набор; Обслуживание помп (медные духовые инструменты); Другое
pt-PT: Finalidade do kit de cuidados para instrumentos de sopro: Limpeza profunda; Limpeza do bocal; Polimento/cuidados de acabamento; Kit profissional; Manutenção de rotina; Kit de programa escolar/banda; Manutenção da vara (trombone); Kit de iniciação para estudante; Kit de viagem/emergência; Manutenção das válvulas (instrumentos de metal com válvulas); Outro
zh-TW: 銅管樂器保養組用途: 深度清潔; 吹嘴清潔; 拋光/表面保養; 專業套件; 例行保養; 學校/樂團套件; 滑管保養 (長號); 學生入門套件; 旅行/緊急套件; 活塞保養 (活塞式銅管樂器); 其他
ko: 금관악기 관리 키트 용도: 정밀 세척; 마우스피스 세척; 폴리싱/마감 관리; 전문가용 키트; 정기 유지관리; 학교/밴드 프로그램 키트; 슬라이드 유지관리(트롬본); 학생용 스타터 키트; 여행용/응급용 키트; 밸브 유지관리(밸브 브라스); 기타
sk-SK: Účel súpravy na starostlivosť o dychové nástroje: Hĺbkové čistenie; Čistenie náustka; Leštenie/starostlivosť o povrch; Profesionálna súprava; Bežná údržba; Súprava pre školu/kapelu; Údržba ťahcov (pozón); Začiatočnícka súprava pre študentov; Cestovná/núdzová súprava; Údržba ventilov (plechové nástroje s ventilmi); Iný
es: Propósito del kit de cuidado para instrumentos de viento-metal: Limpieza profunda; Limpieza de boquilla; Pulido/cuidado del acabado; Kit profesional; Mantenimiento de rutina; Kit para escuelas/programas de banda; Mantenimiento de vara (trombón); Kit de inicio para estudiantes; Kit de viaje/emergencia; Mantenimiento de válvulas (instrumentos de viento metal con válvulas); Otro
da: Formål med plejesæt til messinginstrumenter: Dybdegående rens; Rensning af mundstykke; Polering/overfladepleje; Professionelt sæt; Rutinemæssig vedligeholdelse; Sæt til skole/orkester; Trækvedligeholdelse (basun); Begyndersæt til elever; Rejse-/nødsæt; Ventilvedligeholdelse (messingblæsere med ventil); Andet
pt-BR: Finalidade do kit de cuidados para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Limpeza profunda; Limpeza do bocal; Polimento/cuidado do acabamento; Kit profissional; Manutenção de rotina; Kit para escola/programa de banda; Manutenção da vara (trombone); Kit para iniciantes/estudantes; Kit de viagem/emergência; Manutenção de válvula (metais com válvulas); Outro
ja: 真鍮楽器ケアキットの使用目的: ディープクリーニング; マウスピースクリーニング; 研磨/仕上げケア; プロフェッショナルキット; 定期メンテナンス; 学校/バンドプログラムキット; スライドメンテナンス (トロンボーン); 学生用スターターキット; トラベル/エマージェンシーキット; バルブメンテナンス (ピストン/ロータリー楽器); その他
en: Brass instrument care kit purpose: Deep cleaning; Mouthpiece cleaning; Polishing/finish care; Professional kit; Routine maintenance; School/band program kit; Slide maintenance (trombone); Student starter kit; Travel/emergency kit; Valve maintenance (valved brass); Other
sv: Syfte med kit för bleckblåsinstrument: Djuprengöring; Rengöring av munstycke; Polering / Ytvård; Professionellt kit; Regelbundet underhåll; Skol-/orkesterkit; Dragunderhåll (trombon); Nybörjarkit för elever; Rese-/nödkit; Ventilunderhåll (bleckblås med ventiler); Övrigt
pl: Zestaw do pielęgnacji instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Dogłębne czyszczenie; Czyszczenie ustnika; Polerowanie/pielęgnacja wykończenia; Zestaw profesjonalny; Bieżąca konserwacja; Zestaw dla szkół/orkiestr; Konserwacja suwaka (puzon); Zestaw startowy dla uczniów; Zestaw podróżny/awaryjny; Konserwacja wentyli (instrumenty dęte z wentylami); Inne
zh-CN: 铜管乐器保养套件用途: 深度清洁; 号嘴清洁; 抛光/表面护理; 专业套件; 日常维护; 学校/乐队项目套件; 滑管维护（长号）; 学生入门套件; 旅行/应急套件; 活塞维护（活塞铜管乐器）; 其他
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของชุดดูแลรักษาเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: ทำความสะอาดล้ำลึก; ทำความสะอาดปากเป่า; การขัดเงา/การดูแลพื้นผิว; ชุดอุปกรณ์สำหรับมืออาชีพ; การบำรุงรักษาประจำวัน; ชุดอุปกรณ์สำหรับโรงเรียน/วงดนตรี; การบำรุงรักษาสไลด์ (ทรอมโบน); ชุดเริ่มต้นสำหรับนักเรียน; ชุดอุปกรณ์พกพา/ฉุกเฉิน; การบำรุงรักษาวาล์ว (เครื่องเป่าทองเหลืองแบบมีวาล์ว); อื่นๆ
vi: Mục đích của bộ dụng cụ chăm sóc nhạc cụ bằng đồng thau: Vệ sinh sâu; Vệ sinh búp kèn; Đánh bóng/Chăm sóc lớp phủ ngoài; Bộ dụng cụ chuyên nghiệp; Bảo dưỡng định kỳ; Bộ dụng cụ cho trường học/ban nhạc; Bảo dưỡng ống trượt (trombone); Bộ dụng cụ cơ bản cho học sinh; Bộ dụng cụ du lịch/khẩn cấp; Bảo dưỡng van (nhạc cụ đồng có van); Khác
bg-BG: Предназначение на комплекта за поддръжка на месингови музикални инструменти.: Дълбоко почистване; Почистване на мундщук; Полиране/грижа за покритието; Професионален комплект; Рутинна поддръжка; Комплект за училище/оркестър; Поддръжка на цуг (тромбон); Начален комплект за ученици; Комплект за пътуване/спешни случаи; Поддръжка на вентили (медни инструменти с вентили); Други
nl: Koperblazers onderhoudsset doel: Diepe reiniging; Reiniging mondstuk; Polijsten/onderhoud afwerking; Professionele kit; Regulier onderhoud; Kit voor school/bandprogramma; Onderhoud schuif (trombone); Starterset voor leerlingen; Reis-/noodkit; Onderhoud ventielen (koperblazers met ventiel); Overig
ro-RO: Scopul kitului de îngrijire a instrumentelor din alamă: Curățare profundă; Curățarea muștiucului; Lustruire/întreținere finisaj; Kit profesional; Întreținere de rutină; Kit pentru școli/fanfare; Întreținere culisă (trombon); Kit pentru începători; Kit de călătorie/urgență; Întreținere valve (instrumente de suflat din alamă cu valve); Altele
nb: Stell av messinginstrumenter, formål: Dyprengjøring; Rengjøring av munnstykke; Polering/overflatebehandling; Profesjonelt sett; Rutinemessig vedlikehold; Sett for skole/korps; Sleidevedlikehold (trombone); Startsett for elever; Reise-/nødsett; Ventilvedlikehold (messinginstrumenter med ventiler); Annet
tr: Pirinç üflemeli çalgı bakım kiti amacı: Derinlemesine temizlik; Ağızlık temizliği; Parlatma/yüzey bakımı; Profesyonel kit; Rutin bakım; Okul/bando program kiti; Sürgü bakımı (trombon); Öğrenci başlangıç kiti; Seyahat/acil durum kiti; Piston bakımı (pistonlu bakır nefesliler); Diğer
cs: Zamýšlený účel sady péče o žesťové nástroje: Hloubkové čištění; Čištění nátrubku; Leštění / péče o povrch; Profesionální sada; Běžná údržba; Sada pro školu/orchestr; Údržba snižce (trombon); Studentská startovací sada; Cestovní/pohotovostní sada; Údržba ventilů (žesťové nástroje s ventily); Jiné